Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2604
Municipal Infrastructure Redevelopment Fund; created; investment.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a cash fund to be known as the Municipal Infrastructure Redevelopment Fund. The fund shall have a separate account for each municipality in the state. Money shall be deposited into the fund pursuant to section 77-2602.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings on each account shall be credited to that account.

Laws 1989, LB 683, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 13.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.